District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.323

Required information before approval.

(a)

To be eligible to receive a subgrant from the grant-managing entity pursuant to § 1-325.322, a subgrantee shall submit the following required documentation to the grant- managing entity, as well as any additional information required by the grant-managing entity:

(1)

Internal Revenue Service certification that the organization is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, approved August 16, 1954 (68A 24 Stat. 163; 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3));

(2)

(A)

The organization’s most recent financial audit, not more than 2 years old; or

(B)

A recent financial statement, not more than one year old, prepared by a certified accountant that shows that the organization is in good financial standing and which delineates its:

(i)

Existing assets and liabilities;

(ii)

Pending lawsuits, if any; and

(iii)

Pending and final judgments, if any,

(3)

Internal Revenue Service Form 990 covering the organization’s most recently completed fiscal year;

(4)

A notarized statement from the subgrantee certifying that:

(A)

The organization is current on District and federal taxes;

(B)

The grant-managing entity is authorized to verify the organization’s tax status with the Office of Tax and Revenue and the Office of Tax and Revenue is authorized to release this information to the grant-managing entity;

(C)

The grant-managing entity shall have access to the subgrantee’s financial, administrative, and operational records, including specific consent for the grant- managing entity to access its books, accounts, records, findings, and documents related to the subgrant; and

(D)

The subgrantee is registered with the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs; and

(5)

A comprehensive program statement that includes a detailed:

(A)

Scope of work; and

(B)

Budget that describes how the subgrant funds shall be spent.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5144, 61 DCR 9990